Mississippi, session 2026, HB4130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  As used in this act: (a)  "Alliance" means the economic and industrial development authority established under the provisions of this act and known as the Yazoo Economic Alliance. (b)  "Board of supervisors" means the Board of Supervisors of Yazoo County, Mississippi. (c)  "County" means Yazoo County, Mississippi. (d) "Trustee" means either the board of supervisors or separately appointed individuals, as set forth in Section 2(b), who govern and control the Alliance. SECTION 2.  (a)  When the board of supervisors shall find and determine that the public convenience and necessity require the same, as evidenced by a resolution duly adopted and entered on the official minutes of such board, it shall establish an economic and industrial development authority, to be known as the Yazoo Economic Alliance. (b) The Alliance shall be composed of five (5) trustees.  The board of supervisors, in its sole discretion, shall either (i) appoint themselves to serve as the trustees with terms to run concurrently with their terms of office for supervisor, or (ii) appoint five (5) trustees who are not county officials or employees, but are qualified electors of the county. (c) For those trustees appointed under Section 2(b)(ii) herein, the following shall apply: (i) Three (3) of the trustees of the Alliance shall serve a term of one (1) year and the remaining two (2) trustees shall serve a term of two (2) years. Trustees may be reappointed without limitation. (ii) Any trustee of the Alliance may be disqualified and removed from office for either of the following reasons: 1. Conviction of a felony; or 2. Failure to attend three (3) consecutive meetings without just cause. (iii) If a trustee of the Alliance is removed for one of the above reasons, the vacancy shall be filled in the manner prescribed in this section. (iv) Vacancies which occur shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments and shall be made for the unexpired term. (v) The board of supervisors of the county, or their designee(s), shall be nonvoting, ex-officio members of the Alliance for purposes of serving only in an advisory capacity to the trustees of the Alliance.  The attendance of any supervisor at Alliance meetings shall not count towards a quorum of the trustees of the Alliance. SECTION 3.  Before entering upon the duties of the office, each trustee of such Alliance, unless such trustees are the board of supervisors, shall take and subscribe the oath of office required by Section 268, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, and shall give bond in the sum of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), conditioned upon the faithful performance of his or her duties, such bond to be made payable to the Alliance and to be approved by the Alliance.  The premiums on all the surety bonds shall be paid by the Alliance.  The trustees of such Alliance shall meet at the regular meeting place of the board of supervisors of the county within five (5) days after the trustees are initially appointed and shall elect from among their number a chairman, vice chairman and secretary-treasurer of the Alliance and shall adopt a seal and such bylaws, rules and regulations as may be necessary to govern the time, place and manner for holding subsequent meetings of the Alliance and for conduct of its business, not inconsistent with the provisions of this act.  The trustees of the Alliance shall serve without salary or compensation, provided, however, that their actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties may be reimbursed, including mileage as authorized by law for state employees. SECTION 4.  (a)  The Alliance is hereby expressly authorized and empowered to acquire by gift, purchase or otherwise, and to own, hold, maintain, control and develop real estate and personal property situated within the county, either within or without the corporate limits of a municipality, for development, use and operation as industrial park complexes, industrial sites, business parks or for other economic development purposes whether for commercial, industrial, agricultural or otherwise, such complexes, sites and purposes hereinafter referred to in this act as "projects," and is further authorized and empowered to engage in works of internal improvement therefor, including, but not limited to, construction or contracting for the construction of streets, roads, railroads, site improvements, and water, sewerage, drainage, pollution and other related facilities necessary or required for the development of such projects, and to acquire, purchase, install, lease, finance, construct, own, hold, equip, control, maintain, use, operate and repair structures and facilities necessary and convenient for the planning, development, use, operation and maintenance of such projects, including, but not limited to, utility installations, elevators, compressors, warehouses, buildings, and air, rail and other transportation terminals, and pollution control facilities.  In the event the Alliance takes by gift or otherwise any land, buildings or other tangible assets from any persons, corporations, public or private, the Alliance may assume all or any part of the liabilities resulting from such acceptance under such terms and conditions as will be in the best interest of the citizens of the county. (b) The Alliance is authorized and empowered to sell, lease, trade, exchange or otherwise dispose of sites situated within projects to individuals, firms or corporations, public or private, for all types of industrial, commercial, agricultural or other economic development uses upon such terms and conditions, for such consideration whether monetarily or otherwise, and with such safeguards as will best promote and protect the public interest, convenience and necessity, and to execute options, deeds, leases, contracts, easements and other legal instruments necessary or convenient therefor.  The Alliance may also contribute funds and/or resources directly to the development and cost of operation of any industrial development foundation or other private economic development group in the county and may enter into any contracts or agreements effectuating the same which shall be binding on successor boards. (c) The Alliance is authorized and empowered to fix and prescribe fees, charges and rates for the use of any water, sewerage, pollution or other facilities constructed and operated in connection with projects and to collect the same from persons, firms and corporations using the same for industrial, commercial, agricultural or other economic development purposes, except as to rates and charges against common carriers regulated by an agency of the federal government or the Mississippi Public Service Commission. (d) The Alliance is authorized and empowered to employ engineers, attorneys, accountants, consultants and such executive and administrative personnel and other employees or independent contractors as shall be reasonably necessary to carry out the duties and authority authorized by this act, to determine their qualifications and duties and to establish compensation and other employment benefits as may be advisable to attract and retain proficient personnel.  The employees or contractors, if any, of the Alliance shall not be considered as employees of the county for state retirement or any other public purposes.  The Alliance, in addition to all other powers, is authorized and empowered to purchase, lease, sell and trade office equipment, to purchase necessary office supplies, to purchase or lease any equipment and vehicles the Alliance deems necessary for economic and industrial development and to carry out the purposes of this act.  The Alliance is authorized, in addition to all other powers, to buy, lease, sell, convey and do all other necessary business transaction for carrying out the purpose of and administering the Alliance and to do all acts necessary and convenient to operate and carry out the duties of the Alliance. (e) When disposing of its real property pursuant to this act, the Alliance may contract with duly licensed realtors and real estate brokers and may pay real estate commissions resulting from such dispositions not to exceed six percent (6%) resulting from such dispositions.  No Alliance board trustee, officer or employee may be paid a real estate commission or any other form of compensation from such disposition. (f) Subject to the prior written approval of the board of supervisors, if applicable, the Alliance is expressly authorized and empowered to borrow money by issuing its negotiable promissory notes which may be secured by execution of a deed of trust upon any property owned by the Alliance, or other collateral available to or in the possession of the Alliance.  In addition to any available, nonobligated revenues and other funds of the Alliance, the board of supervisors may pledge all or any portion of the levy authorized for support of the Alliance provided for in Section 8 of this act for the repayment of any indebtedness authorized under the provisions of this act, and the county shall be obligated to continue such levy until the authorized indebtedness is paid in full.  The pledge of the tax levy to secure repayment of any sums borrowed shall be done only by order spread upon the minutes of the board of supervisors and the Alliance after the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the board of supervisors and trustees of the Alliance. This authority to borrow money shall be in addition to the authority of the county to borrow money or issue bonds on behalf of the Alliance as specified in Section 4(i) under this act. The county shall not be liable for the repayment of any indebtedness incurred by the Alliance unless the board of supervisors of the county has pledged a portion of the tax levy otherwise authorized as security therefor, in which event the county shall be obligated only to the extent of the tax levy so pledged.  The board of supervisors may, however, authorize payment on such debt from other sources available for such payment. (g) The enumeration of any specific rights and powers contained herein, and elsewhere in this act, where followed by general powers, shall not be construed in a restrictive sense, but rather in as broad and comprehensive a sense as possible to effectuate the purposes of this act.  Nothing in this act should be construed to limit, restrict, or otherwise alter the duties, responsibilities and authority of the board of supervisors as provided under the Mississippi Constitution of 1890 and the laws of the State of Mississippi. (h) Any industrial or economic development purchase agreement or lease or related economic development agreements may be executed upon such terms and conditions, which shall be binding on any successor boards, and for such monetary rental or other consideration as may be found adequate and approved by the Alliance in orders or resolutions authorizing the same.  Any covenants and obligations of the purchaser or lessee to make expenditures in determined amounts, and within such time or times, for improvements to be erected on the land by such purchaser or lessee and to conduct thereon industrial or economic development operations in such aggregate payroll amounts and for such period of time or times as may be determined and defined in such purchase agreement or lease, and to give preference in employment where practicable to qualified residents of the county in which any project is situated, shall, if included in such purchase agreement or lease, constitute and be deemed sufficient consideration for the execution of any such purchase agreement or lease in the absence of a monetary rental or other consideration.  Any such instrument may contain reasonable provisions giving the purchaser or lessee the right to remove its or his improvements upon termination of the lease. (i) Upon the request of the Alliance and in addition to any other authority prescribed by law, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may issue bonds for the benefit of the Alliance pursuant to the authority contained in Section 19-5-99, Mississippi Code of 1972. (j) Not less than sixty (60) days prior to the end of its fiscal year, the Alliance shall file with the board of supervisors a budget of projected revenues, expenses and other financial activities for the coming fiscal year in a form satisfactory to the board of supervisors and, in addition thereto, as soon after the end of each fiscal year as practicable, the Alliance shall file with the board of supervisors a copy of its certified audit and financial statement for the immediate past fiscal year of the Alliance. SECTION 5.  The Alliance is authorized and empowered to take all actions and expend any such funds of the Alliance as shall be necessary or determined to be in the public interests for the promotion of economic and/or industrial development in the county, including, but not limited to, efforts to develop, promote, attract and/or expand existing businesses and industries, new businesses and industries, tourism, aerospace and aviation businesses, communications and information technology businesses, remote data centers, contact centers, warehousing and distribution businesses, shared services centers, defends homeland/security businesses, metal fabrication businesses, research and development businesses, manufacturing, tourism and hospitality businesses within the county, and to expend such funds of the Alliance as shall be necessary or determined in the public interests to develop and promote the county's workforce, promote available jobs within the county, and to develop and promote such training programs for the same. SECTION 6.  The carrying out of the corporate purposes of the Alliance is in all respects for the benefit of the people of the county and is a public purpose, and the Alliance will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the powers conferred upon it by this act.  Hence, any property owned or held by the Alliance or under its jurisdiction under the provisions of this act shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi. SECTION 7.  The notes specifically authorized by this act shall be exempt from all income taxation in the state and shall not be included in any debt limit calculation. SECTION 8.  (a)  In addition to rights, duties and powers now or hereafter conferred upon the board of supervisors, the board of supervisors, at the request of the Alliance, if applicable, is authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to make available to the Alliance any revenue in the general fund of the county which is otherwise unappropriated, for economic or industrial development purposes.  If it currently levies and collects the tax pursuant to Section 19-9-111, Mississippi Code of 1972, the board of supervisors may, in its discretion and without the need to re-authorize and re-notice intent, continue to the levy the tax of the not more than two (2) mills to be used to support and maintain the Alliance. If such tax is not currently levied, the board of supervisors may levy such tax in accordance with Section 19-9-111, Mississippi Code of 1972, to support and maintain the Alliance. (b) Further, the board of supervisors may, in its discretion, levy an additional tax of not more than two (2) mills against the taxable property in the county to be used to support and maintain the Alliance created hereunder. Before any such levy is made, the board of supervisors shall signify its intention to make such a levy and publish same in a newspaper published in said county for thirty (30) days prior to making said levy.  In the event more than twenty percent (20%) or fifteen hundred (1500), whichever is less, of the qualified electors of the county protest in writing to the board of supervisors against the imposition of such tax levy within thirty (30) days from the date such notice is published, then such proposed tax levy shall not be made unless same is approved by a special election called for said purpose.  Said special election shall be conducted and had as provided by law.  This levy shall be in addition to all other levies provided by law and in this act. SECTION 9.  The Alliance, in addition to the monies which may be received by it from the sale of bonds, notes and from the collection of revenues, rents and earnings derived under the provisions of this act, shall have the authority to accept from any public or private agency, or from any individual, grants for or in aid of the construction of any project, or for the payment of bonds, and to receive and accept contributions from any source of money or property or other things of value to be held, used and applied only for the purposes for which such grants or contributions may be made. SECTION 10.  (a)  Notwithstanding any provision of this act to the contrary, the trustees of the Alliance, with the written approval of the board of supervisors, if applicable, and the governing authorities of any municipality located within the county, may enter into a contract providing for the delivery of economic development and/or industrial development services to the municipality and contribution of funds by the municipality to the Alliance.  If the municipality contributes funds to the Alliance, the contract may provide for the appointment by the municipal governing authorities of such number of nonvoting representatives, as may be determined by the parties to the contract, to advise in the management of the Alliance. (b) The trustees of the Alliance, with the approval of the board of supervisors, if applicable, may enter into a contract or agreement with the governing body of any other local or regional economic or industrial development foundation, private economic development group, or other public entity or alliance for the purposes of promoting, attracting and locating economic and/or industrial development within the county.  Such contracts and agreements shall be binding on successor boards. SECTION 11.  Upon the creation of the Alliance authorized by this act, the board of supervisors is authorized, by duly adopted resolution, to dissolve the Yazoo County Economic Development District, created by Section 19-5-99, Mississippi Code of 1972, and to transfer, donate or sell any part of the assets, liabilities and other responsibilities and obligations of the district, to the Alliance under such terms and conditions as may be in the best interest of the county, or as may be otherwise required by law to effectuate the intent of this act. SECTION 12.  The Alliance is authorized to apply for and accept grants and loans on behalf of the Alliance, the county and any contracting municipality from the State of Mississippi or the United States of America or any agency thereof; and, to contract with any agency of the State of Mississippi and United States of America for the development of the county. SECTION 13.  This act shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the exercise of the powers herein granted, but this act shall not be deemed to repeal or to be in derogation of any existing law of this state whereunder projects of the character herein defined may be constructed or financed. SECTION 14.  The board of supervisors are authorized and empowered to adopt any and all lawful resolutions, orders and/or ordinances; to execute such documents, contracts, leases, certificates and indentures; and to do and perform any and all acts and things necessary and requisite to carry out the purposes of this act. SECTION 15.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.